Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE I. WATER CONTROL AND IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 9077. BELL COUNTY WATER CONTROL AND IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT NO. 5

Sec. 9077.0001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "district" means the Bell County Water Control and Improvement District No. 5 in Bell County.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2021.

Sec. 9077.0002. EMINENT DOMAIN. (a) The district may exercise the power of eminent domain to acquire real estate located in Bell County.

(b) The district must exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner provided by Chapter 21, Property Code.

(c) The district's authority under this section to exercise the power of eminent domain expired on September 1, 2013, unless the district submitted a letter to the comptroller in accordance with Section 2206.101(b), Government Code, not later than December 31, 2012.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2021.